Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Agricultural Cooperative Associations

272.1001.
Definition of terms in KRS 272.101 to 272.341.

As used in KRS

272.101

to

272.341

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agricultural products” includes horticultural, viticultural, floricultural, forestry, dairy, livestock, poultry, bee and any farm products;

“Association” means a corporation organized under, or entitled to the benefits of, KRS

272.121

to

272.341

or a corporation which is organized under any general or special act of this state. Such an association shall be classed as and deemed to be a nonprofit corporation, since its primary object is not to make profits for itself, as such, or to pay dividends or invest its capital, but to provide service and a means whereby its members may have the economic advantage of cooperative action, including a reasonable and fair return for their products or service;

“Member” means the holder of a membership in an association without capital stock (whether evidenced by a certificate of membership or other means of identification, including but not limited to the association’s records) or means the holder of voting stock in an association organized with capital stock;

“Board” means the board of directors of the association;

“Person” includes individuals, firms, partnerships, corporations, and associations;

“Foreign association” means a corporation organized under any general or special act of another state, the United States, or the District of Columbia as a cooperative corporation or association for the mutual benefit of its members and other patrons, and which confines its operations to the purposes specified in the cooperative corporation statutes of the jurisdiction of its incorporation, and restricts the return on stock or membership capital, and the amount of its business with nonmembers to the limits placed thereon by the cooperative corporation statutes of the jurisdiction of its incorporation;

“Corporation” means, except as used in subsections (2) and (6) of this section, a corporation for profit organized under any general or special act of this state or of another state, the United States, or the District of Columbia; and

“Member-association” means an association or foreign association which is a member of another association or foreign association.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, § 2; 1968, ch. 148, § 1; 1972, ch. 112, § 1.

272.101.
Purpose of law.

In enacting KRS

272.1001

,

272.101

to

272.341

, it is the intention of the General Assembly to promote, foster and encourage the intelligent and orderly production and marketing of agricultural products through cooperation, to eliminate speculation and waste, to make the distribution of agricultural products between producer and consumer as direct as can be efficiently done, and to stabilize the marketing of agricultural products and to provide for the organization and incorporation of agricultural cooperative associations.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, § 1; 1984, ch. 111, § 115, effective July 13, 1984.

272.110.
Powers of the association. [Repealed.]

272.111.
Association — Purposes.

An association may be organized to engage in any activity in connection with the production, harvesting, marketing, selling, preserving, drying, processing, canning, packing, grading, storing, handling, shipping or utilization of the agricultural products owned, leased, handled or marketed by its members and other farmers, with the manufacture or marketing of the by-products thereof, in connection with the manufacturing, selling, or supplying to its members and other farmers of machinery, equipment or supplies, in the financing of the above-enumerated activities, in performing or furnishing services of economic or educational nature, on a cooperative basis for those engaged in agriculture, or in any one or more of the activities specified herein.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, § 4; 1972, ch. 112, § 2; 1984, ch. 111, § 116, effective July 13, 1984.

272.120.
Members of the association. [Repealed.]

272.121.
Who may organize — Information as to probable success.

Five (5) or more persons engaged in the production of agricultural products, or one or more associates of such producers, may form an association, with or without capital stock.

The dean of the College of Agriculture of the University of Kentucky shall, upon request, inform any association or group of persons contemplating the organization of an association what the results of a survey of the economic conditions affecting the commodities or service proposed to be handled indicate regarding probable success.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, § 3; 1972, ch. 112, § 3.

272.130.
Articles of incorporation; contents; filing; subscriptions to and issuance of capital stock. [Repealed.]

272.131.
Articles of association, contents — Filing effect.

The articles of incorporation of each association shall state:

The name of the association that satisfies KRS

14A.3-010

;

The purposes for which it is formed;

The place where its principal business will be transacted;

The period of duration, which may be perpetual. When the articles of incorporation fail to state the period of duration, it shall be considered perpetual. Any association heretofore or hereafter organized for a period less than perpetual, may, by amendment to its articles of incorporation, extend the period of its duration for a specified period or perpetually;

The names and addresses, not less than five (5), of those who are to serve as directors for the first term or until the election of their successors;

If organized without capital stock, whether the property rights and interest of each member shall be equal or unequal; and if unequal, the articles shall set forth the general rules applicable to all members by which the property rights and interests, respectively, of each member shall be determined and fixed; and the association shall have the power to admit new members who shall be entitled to share in the property of the association with the old members in accordance with the general rules. These provisions of the articles of incorporation shall not be altered, amended, or repealed except by the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of the votes entitled to be cast by members present in person, or by proxy, if permitted by the bylaws, and voting thereon at any regular or special meeting; and

If organized with capital stock, the authorized amount of the stock and the number of shares into which it is divided and the par value thereof. Capital stock may be divided into preferred and common stock. The articles of incorporation must contain a statement of the number of shares of stock to which preference is granted and the number of shares of stock to which no preference is granted and the nature and extent of the preference and the privileges granted to each. No specific amount of the capital stock authorized is required to be subscribed before the association may transact business with other than its members; the board may determine the amount of capital stock to be issued as the business of the association may justify or demand, from time to time, within the amount of the total authorization.

The articles of incorporation may contain any provision consistent with law with respect to management, regulation, government, financing, indebtedness, membership, the establishment of voting districts and the election of delegates for representative purposes, the issuance, retirement and transfer of its stock, if formed with capital stock, or any provisions relative to the way or manner in which it shall operate with respect to its members, officers, or directors, and any other provisions relating to its affairs; but nothing set forth in this section shall be construed as limiting any of the rights or powers otherwise given to such associations.

The articles of incorporation must be subscribed by the incorporators and acknowledged by one (1) of them before an officer authorized by the laws of this state to take and certify acknowledgments of deeds and conveyances; and shall be filed and recorded in accordance with the statute relating to corporations generally; and when so filed, the articles of incorporation, or certified copies thereof, shall be received in all the courts of this state, and other places, as prima facie evidence of the facts contained therein, and of the due incorporation of the association. A copy of the articles of incorporation, indorsed by the Secretary of State with the fact and time of recording in his office, shall be filed with the dean of the College of Agriculture of the University of Kentucky and with the Commissioner of the Department of Agriculture.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, §
5; 1984, ch. 111, §
117, effective July 13, 1984; 2007, ch. 137, §
77, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, § 77, effective July 15, 2010; repealed, reenact., and amend., Acts 2010, ch. 151, § 57, effective January 1, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/1/2011). This section was repealed, reenacted, and amended by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 151, and repealed and reenacted by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment not serve to void the amendment, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict, therefore, they have been codified together.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Articles of incorporation of corporations generally, KRS

271B.2-020

.

Directors of ordinary private corporation, KRS

271B.8-010

.

Recording corporate instruments, name of draftsman thereon, KRS

382.335

.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

272.140.
Amendment to articles; filing fees for articles or amendments. [Repealed.]

272.141.
Amendments to articles, how made — Contents — Filing.

Amendments to the articles of incorporation shall be made in the following manner: The board shall by an affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of its members, present and voting at any regular or special meeting, adopt a resolution approving the proposed amendment and directing that the proposed amendment be submitted to a vote of the association members at any annual or special meeting duly called. Written or printed notice setting forth the proposed amendment, or a summary of the changes to be effected thereby, shall be given to each member of the association entitled to vote at any such meeting, within the time and in the manner provided in KRS

272.161

. The proposed amendment, or amendments, shall be adopted by the affirmative vote of not less than a majority of the votes entitled to be cast by the members present in person, or by proxy (if permitted by the bylaws), and voting at any such meeting.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, an amendment whose only effect is to extend an association’s period of duration may be adopted by the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of the directors present and voting at any duly called board meeting, and shall become effective when signed and acknowledged by the chairman, or other presiding officer, of the board and filed and recorded pursuant to KRS

272.131

.

The articles of amendment shall set forth:

The name of the association;

The amendment adopted;

A statement setting forth the date of the meeting of the board at which the amendment or amendments were approved; that the meeting was duly called and that a quorum was present; and that a resolution approving the proposed amendment, or amendments, received an affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of the members of the board present and voting at such meeting;

A statement setting forth the date of the meeting of the members of the association at which the amendment was adopted; that the meeting was duly called and that a quorum was present; and that such amendment received an affirmative vote of not less than a majority of the votes entitled to be cast by members present in person, or by proxy (if permitted by the bylaws), and voting at such meeting.

For the recording of articles of incorporation or amendments thereto by the Secretary of State and county clerk, and for the issuance of a certificate of incorporation or certificate of amendment by the Secretary of State, an association shall pay the same fees as are provided for such services in the statutes relating to corporations generally.

A copy of the articles of amendment indorsed by the Secretary of State with the fact and time of recording in his office, shall be filed with the dean of the College of Agriculture of the University of Kentucky, and with the Commissioner of the Department of Agriculture.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, § 6; 1978, ch. 384, § 446, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 111, § 118, effective July 13, 1984.

272.145.
Effect of amendment to extend corporations duration. [Repealed.]

272.150.
Bylaws of Association. [Repealed.]

272.151.
Bylaws, adoption, contents — Withdrawal of member — Rights — Amendment of bylaws.

Each association shall within thirty (30) days after its incorporation, adopt for its government and management a code of bylaws. The affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of the members present and voting at a meeting, of which reasonable notice of the proposed bylaws shall have been given, is sufficient to adopt such bylaws.

An association in its bylaws may provide for any, or all, of the following:

The time, place, and manner of calling and conducting its meetings.

The number of members constituting a quorum.

The right of members to vote by proxy or by mail, or by both, and the conditions, manner, form, and effects of such votes.

The number of directors constituting a quorum.

The offices, qualifications, compensations, duties and terms of office of directors and officers; time of their election, and the mode and manner of giving notice thereof.

Penalties for violations of the bylaws.

The amount of entrance, organization, and membership fees, if any; the manner and method of collection of the same, and the purposes for which they may be used.

The amount which each member shall be required to pay annually, or from time to time, if at all, to carry on the business of the association; the charge, if any, to be paid by each member directly or by utilization of retained earnings for services rendered by the association to him, and the time of payment and the manner of collection; and the marketing agreement between the association and its members, which every member may be required to sign.

The number and qualification of members of the association and the conditions precedent to membership; the method, time, and manner of permitting members to withdraw; the manner of assignment and transfer of the interest of members, and of stock; the conditions upon which, and the time when membership of any member shall cease; the automatic suspension of the rights of a member when he ceases to be eligible to membership in the association, and mode, manner, and effect of the expulsion of a member, manner of determining the value of a member’s interest and provision for its purchase by the association upon the death or withdrawal of a member, or upon the expulsion of a member or forfeiture of his membership, or at the option of the association, by conclusive appraisal by the board.

Unless provided otherwise in an association’s bylaws, the board shall equitably and conclusively appraise the value of a withdrawing or expelled member’s property interest in the association and shall fix the amount thereof in money and shall determine the manner in which the association shall pay the member the value of his interest.

The bylaws of an association may be amended, changed, or altered at any time by the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of the members of the board present and voting at any regular or special meeting of the board of directors duly called and held.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, § 8; 1968, ch. 148, § 2.

272.160.
General and special meetings; how called. [Repealed.]

272.161.
Meetings, notice.

An association may provide in its bylaws for one or more regular meetings each year. Special meetings of the members of the association may be called by the board; it shall be the board’s duty to call such meetings when ten percent (10%) of the members of the association file with the association secretary a petition demanding a special meeting and specifying the business to be considered at such meeting. Regular or special meetings may be held within or without the state. Notice of all meetings, except as otherwise provided by law or in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, shall be mailed to each member at least ten (10) days prior to the meeting, and in case of special meetings the notice shall state the purposes for which it is called, but the bylaws may provide that all notices, except of proposed amendments to the articles of incorporation, may be given by publication in a periodical or newsletter published by or for the association of which substantially all its members are recipients, or in newspapers whose combined circulation is general in the territory in which the association operates.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, § 9; 1984, ch. 111, § 119, effective July 13, 1984.

272.170.
Directors; election; vacancy; compensation; executive committee. [Repealed.]

272.171.
Board of directors — Election — Vacancies — Compensation — Executive committee — Action taken without meeting.

The affairs of the association shall be managed by a board of not less than five (5) directors, elected by the members from their own number or from the members of any member-association except as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

The bylaws may provide that the territory in which the association has members shall be divided into districts and that the directors shall be elected according to these districts, either directly or by district delegates elected by the members in that district. In that case the bylaws shall specify the number of directors to be elected by each district, the method of apportioning the directors and of districting the territory covered by the association. The bylaws may provide that primary elections shall be held in each district to elect the directors and that the result of primary elections may be ratified by the next regular meeting of the members of the association or may be considered final as to the association.

The bylaws may provide that one or more directors may be appointed by any public official or commission or by the other directors selected by the members or their delegates. These directors shall represent primarily the interest of the general public in the association. The director appointed need not be a member of the association, but shall have the same rights as other directors. Such directors shall not number more than one-fifth (1/5) of the entire number of directors.

When a vacancy on the board occurs other than by expiration of term, the remaining members of the board shall fill the vacancy for the unexpired term or until the next regular or special meeting of the members, whichever occurs first, by an affirmative vote of not less than a majority of those members present and voting at a duly called regular or special meeting. If the bylaws provide for an election of directors by district, the board shall immediately call a special meeting of the members in that district to fill the vacancy.

An association may provide a fair remuneration for the time actually spent by its officers and directors in its service, and for the service of the members of its executive committee. No director, during the term of his office, shall be a party to a contract for profit with the association differing in any way from the business relations accorded regular members of the association or others, or differing from terms generally current in that district.

The bylaws may provide for an executive committee and may allot to it all the functions and powers of the board, subject to the general direction and control of the board.

Unless otherwise restricted by the articles of incorporation, or bylaws, any action required or permitted to be taken at any meeting of the board or any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if a written consent thereto is signed by all members of the board or of such committee as the case may be, and such written consent is filed with the minutes of proceedings of the board or committee.

Every director of a corporation, by acceptance of election or appointment as a director, including by service, shall be deemed to have consented to the jurisdiction of the courts of the Commonwealth of Kentucky for any action by, in the name of, or on behalf of the corporation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, § 11; 1972, ch. 112, § 4; 2012, ch. 81, § 97, effective July 12, 2012.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Directors of ordinary private corporation, KRS

271B.8-300

to

271B.8-330

.

272.180.
Election of officers. [Repealed.]

272.181.
Officers.

The board shall elect from their number a president and one (1) or more vice presidents. They shall also elect a secretary and a treasurer, who need not be directors or members of the association. The two (2) offices of secretary and treasurer may be combined in one (1) person. The treasurer may be a bank or other depository, and as such shall not be considered as an officer but as a function of the board and the secretary shall perform the usual accounting duties of the treasurer, except that the funds shall be deposited only as authorized by the board. The bylaws of the association may authorize the creation and fix the responsibilities of any other office. Every officer of a corporation, by acceptance of election or appointment as an officer, including by service, shall be deemed to have consented to the jurisdiction of the courts of the Commonwealth of Kentucky for any action by, in the name of, or on behalf of the corporation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, § 1; 2012, ch. 81, § 98, effective July 12, 2012.

272.190.
Membership certificate; when issued; voting; liability; limitations on transfer and ownership. [Repealed.]

272.191.
Who may become members.

Under terms and conditions prescribed in its bylaws, an association may admit as members (or issue voting stock to) only persons engaged in the production of agricultural products, including tenants and landlords who receive any part of the crop raised on the leased premises or one or more associations of such producers. An association or foreign association may be the sole member or holder of all the voting stock of an association or of a foreign association.

If any member of an association organized or brought hereunder be other than a natural person, such member may be represented by an individual, delegate, associate, officer, or member thereof, duly authorized in writing.

Associations organized hereunder may become members of other associations.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, § 10; 1972, ch. 112, § 5.

272.200.
Removal of officer or director. [Repealed.]

272.201.
Membership certificate — Capital stock — Payment for — Voting rights — Purchase or redemption of stock.

When a member of an association established without capital stock has paid the membership fee in full, the member shall receive notice of such membership whether by a certificate of membership, letter, or otherwise. Such membership shall not be transferable except as may be prescribed in the articles of incorporation and bylaws of the association.

No association shall issue capital stock until it has been fully paid for. Promissory notes may be accepted by an association as full or partial payment. An association may hold the stock as security for the payment of the note, but retention as security shall not affect a member’s right to vote.

An association, in its bylaws, may limit the amount of voting stock which one (1) member may own. No member of an association composed solely of producers of agricultural products shall be allowed to control more than forty-nine percent (49%) of such association’s voting power.

An association, in its bylaws, may provide that no member shall have more than one (1) vote.

An association organized under KRS

272.101

to

272.341

whose members are one (1) or more associations may determine by its bylaws the number of votes to which each member-association is entitled and provide for the appointment or election of delegates to cast the votes and to represent the member-associations at all membership meetings.

An association organized with stock may issue preferred stock, with or without the right to vote. Such stock may be redeemable or retirable by the association on terms and conditions provided for by the articles of incorporation and printed on the face of the certificate.

The voting stock of an association shall be transferable only to persons engaged in the production of agricultural products or to associations of such persons. Such restrictions must be printed upon every certificate of voting stock.

Except when its debts exceed fifty percent (50%) of its assets, an association may purchase for cash its capital stock at book value or par value, whichever is less, and may call such stock for redemption on the same basis pursuant to a plan for rotating ownership of such stock set forth in its articles of incorporation or in its bylaws. The determination of book value by the board of directors shall be incontestable except for fraud.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, § 13; 1972, ch. 112, § 6; 2010, ch. 133, § 13, effective July 15, 2010.

272.203.
Liability of shareholder or member.

A purchaser from an association of its own shares shall not be liable to the association or its creditors with respect to the shares except to pay the consideration for which the shares were authorized to be issued or specified in the subscription agreement.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, a shareholder or a member of an association shall not be personally liable for the acts or debts of the association, except that he or she may become personally liable by reason of his or her own acts or conduct.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 133, § 3, effective July 15, 2010.

272.205.
Member may withdraw on amendment of articles.

When an amendment to the articles of incorporation is adopted pursuant to subsection (2) of KRS

272.141

, such an amendment shall be without prejudice to the right of any member or stockholder to withdraw from the association as permitted by subsection (2) of KRS

272.151

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, § 7.

272.210.
Referendum. [Repealed.]

272.211.
Powers of association.

An association has the following powers:

To engage in any activity in connection with the producing, marketing, selling, harvesting, preserving, drying, processing, canning, packaging, grading, storing, handling, or utilization of any agricultural products produced or delivered to it by its members and others; or the manufacturing or marketing of the by-products thereof; or in connection with the purchase, hiring, or use by its members and others of supplies, machinery, or furnishing services of economic or educational nature; or in any one (1) or more of the activities specified in this section;

To limit its business activities to those performed only for its members. If an association transacts business with nonmembers, the same must not exceed in amount the total business transacted by the association for its members;

To borrow money without limitation as to amount of indebtedness, and to make advances to members and others;

To act as the agent or representative of any members, or others, in any of the activities referred to in subsection (1) of this section;

To acquire, hold, own, and sell, transfer, pledge or guarantee the payment of dividends or interest on, or in the retirement or redemption of, shares of the capital stock or bonds of any association or corporation;

To establish and accumulate reasonable reserves;

To buy, hold, and exercise all privileges of ownership, over such real or personal property as is necessary or convenient for the conduct and operation of, or incidental to, the business of the association;

To do each and every thing necessary, suitable, or proper for the accomplishment of any one (1) or more of the purposes, or the attainment of any one or more of the objectives herein enumerated; or conducive to or expedient for the interest or benefit of the association; and to contract accordingly; and to exercise and possess all powers, rights, and privileges necessary or incidental to the purposes for which the association is organized or to the activities in which it is engaged; and in addition, any other rights, powers, and privileges granted by the laws of this state to corporations generally, except such as are inconsistent with the express provisions of KRS

272.101

to

272.341

, and to do any such thing anywhere; and

To sue and be sued in its corporate name.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, § 16; 1968, ch. 148, § 3; 1984, ch. 111, § 120, effective July 13, 1984.

272.220.
Marketing contract. [Repealed.]

272.221.
Exclusive contracts for agricultural products — Damages for violation — Injunctive relief — Notice to landlord or tenant.

An association and its members may make and execute contracts, requiring the members to obtain specified services exclusively from the association or to sell, during any designated period of time, all or any specified part of the members’ agricultural products or specified commodities exclusively to or through the association subject to the right of any member to be released at a designated period in each year, by giving prescribed notice. Such contracts may provide that the association may sell or resell the products of its members, with or without taking title thereto, and pay over to its members the resale price, or the pool price in case of pooling of sales, after deducting all necessary selling, overhead, and other costs and expenses, including interest or dividends on stock, not exceeding eight percent (8%) per annum, and any other deduction authorized by the bylaws or such marketing contracts.

An association’s bylaws or contracts with members may fix, as liquidated damages, specific sums to be paid by a member to the association if he breaches any provision of the contract and may provide that the member shall pay all costs, premiums for bonds, expenses and fees, in case any action is brought upon the contract by the association. Liquidated damage provisions in contracts with members shall be enforceable in the courts of this state and shall not be regarded as penalties.

If a breach or threatened breach of a contract with a member exists, an association shall be entitled to an injunction to prevent the breach or further breach of the contract, and to a decree of specific performance thereof. Pending the adjudication of such an action, and upon filing a verified complaint showing the breach or threatened breach, and upon filing a sufficient bond, the association shall be entitled to a temporary restraining order and preliminary injunction against members.

A landowner, or lessee, of land on which any agricultural products marketed or to be marketed by an association are being raised or are to be raised, may by registered letter addressed to an association, ask for information as to whether his tenant, or landlord as the case may be, is a member of the association, or has signed a contract with the association, and may request information as to the terms of such contract. The request shall state the full name and address of the person inquired about. An association shall, within ten (10) days after receipt of such a request, furnish the information in writing to the person so inquiring. If an association fails to furnish the information properly requested, in any litigation that arises between that association and the person so inquiring, it shall be presumed, in the absence of evidence to the contrary, that that person was without notice that the person inquired about was a member of the association or had signed a contract with the association, or that the person inquiring knew the terms of the contract.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, § 17.

272.230.
Remedies for breach of contract. [Repealed.]

272.231.
Interest of association in other associations.

An association may organize, form, acquire, operate, own, control, have an interest in, own all or a portion of the stock of, or be the sole member of any other association, foreign association or corporation (hereinafter referred to as a subsidiary association). An association may have included in the articles of incorporation or bylaws of a subsidiary association provisions for the control or management of the subsidiary association by the association to such extent as shall by the board of the association, and the members of the subsidiary association be declared to be for the best interests of the association and the subsidiary association, respectively. Such provisions may be so included in the articles of incorporation or bylaws of a subsidiary association and may by way of illustration, but not of limitation, include the following:

Representation of the association on the board or other governing body of the subsidiary association, upon such terms as may be deemed advisable.

Ownership by the association of the sole or other interest in the subsidiary association represented by capital stock of any class thereof or otherwise, to such extent and upon such terms, and with such voting power, as may be deemed advisable.

Participation by the association in the savings of the subsidiary association to such extent and upon such terms as shall be deemed advisable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, § 20; 1968, ch. 148, § 4; 1972, ch. 112, § 7.

Opinions of Attorney General.

An agricultural cooperative association organized under this chapter may merge with a cooperative corporation organized for profit under the laws of another state.

OAG 72-650

.

272.240.
Payment for property or interest purchased, by capital stock.
[Repealed.]

272.241.
Sale, lease or exchange of all assets — Procedure — Mortgage or pledge of assets.

A sale, lease, or exchange of all, or substantially all of the property and assets of an association may be made upon such terms and conditions and for such consideration, which may consist in whole or in part of money or property, real or personal, including shares of any association, or corporation, as may be authorized in the following manner: The board shall adopt a resolution recommending such sale, lease, or exchange and directing that it be submitted to a vote at a meeting of the association members, which may be at either an annual or a special meeting. Written or printed notice of the meeting shall be given to each member of the association entitled to vote at such meeting. The notice shall state that the proposed sale, lease, or exchange will be considered and acted upon at the meeting, and a statement of the terms of the proposed sale, lease, or exchange shall be included in or inclosed with such notice. Each notice shall be mailed by first-class mail at a time that not less than ten (10) full days shall elapse between the date of mailing the notice and the date of the meeting, and shall be mailed to each member of the association at his last known address as it appears on the records of the association. The proposed sale, lease, or exchange shall be adopted by the affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of the votes entitled to be cast by members present, in person or by proxy (if permitted by the bylaws), and voting at any such meeting.

A mortgage or pledge of, or any other security interest in, all or any part of the property of an association may be made by authority of its board, unless otherwise provided in its articles of incorporation or bylaws.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, § 27.

272.250.
Annual report; duty of Dean. [Repealed.]

272.251.
Contracts — Joint employment by associations.

An association may, upon resolution adopted by its board, enter into necessary and proper contracts and agreements for the more economical carrying on of its business. Two (2) or more associations may, by agreement, unite in employing or may separately employ the same personnel, means and agencies for carrying on their businesses.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, § 32.

272.260.
Exemptions of member to extend to association. [Repealed.]

272.261.
Removal of officers or directors — Procedure.

Any member may bring charges against an officer or director by filing them in writing with the secretary of the association, together with a petition signed by ten percent (10%) of the membership, requesting the officer’s or director’s removal. The removal shall be voted upon at the next regular or special meeting of the association. By an affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of the votes entitled to be cast by members present in person, or by proxy (if permitted by the bylaws), and voting, the association may remove such officer or director. The director or officer against whom such charges have been brought shall be informed in writing of the charges prior to the meeting, and shall have an opportunity at the meeting to be heard in person or by counsel, and to present witnesses; and, the person, or persons, bringing the charges shall have the same opportunity.

If an association’s bylaws provide for election of directors by districts, the petition for removal of a director must be signed by not less than twenty percent (20%) of the members residing in the district from which the director was elected. The board may call a special meeting of the members residing in that district to consider the removal of the director. By an affirmative vote of not less than two-thirds (2/3) of the votes entitled to be cast by members present in person, or by proxy (if permitted by the bylaws), and voting, at such meeting duly called and held, the director in question shall be removed from office; except that this section does not apply to directors appointed under subsection (3) of KRS

272.171

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, § 14; 1968, ch. 148, § 5.

272.270.
Interest in other corporations. [Repealed.]

272.271.
Board’s decision referred to membership, when. [Repealed.]

272.280.
Contracts with other associations. [Repealed.]

272.281.
Exemptions of members applicable to association.

Any exemption applying to agricultural products in the possession or under the control of an individual producer shall apply similarly to such products delivered by its members, in the possession or under the control of the association.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 208, § 19.